Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 240.01, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Advance deposit wager. "Advance deposit wager" means a wager placed through an advance deposit wagering provider on a horse race deleted text begin that is conducted outside of the statedeleted text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 240.131, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Source market fees; payment; distribution. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that the proceeds of advance deposit wagering authorized by this chapter be used to support and improve the horse racing industry in Minnesota by improving purses, supporting breeding, and ensuring that the industry is adequately regulated for the protection of all participants. (b) Source market fees shall be established by contract and are in addition to other contractual fees such as host fees. (c) Except as provided in paragraph deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end , a class A or class B licensee shall pay all source market fees it receives from an ADW provider as follows: (1) 28 percent to a licensed racetrack that primarily conducts standardbred horse racing; and (2) 72 percent to a licensed racetrack that primarily conducts Thoroughbred and Quarter Horse racing. (d) Of the total source market fees received by a licensed racetrack under paragraph (c)new text begin for races conducted outside the statenew text end , at least 50 percent must be set aside for breeders awards and purses. Of the amount set aside: (1) at least 33 percent shall be paid by the racetrack to the state for deposit to the breeders fund and must be expended solely for breeders awards in accordance with section 240.18, subdivisions 2, paragraph (d), clause (2), and 3, paragraph (b), clause (2); and (2) the remainder shall be paid by the racetrack to purse accounts for races held at the racetrack pursuant to agreements between the racetrack and the horsepersons' associations that represent a majority of the type of breed that races at the track. new text begin (e) Of the total source market fees received by a licensed racetrack under paragraph (c) for races conducted within the state, at least 50 percent must be set aside for purses and paid by the racetrack to purse accounts for races held at the racetrack pursuant to agreements between the racetrack and the horsepersons' associations that represent a majority of the type of breed that races at the track. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end No source market fees shall be paid by a class A or class B licensee to a licensed racetrack whose license has been revoked or not renewed under this chapter. In the event that a racetrack's license has been revoked or not renewed, source market fees otherwise payable to that racetrack by a class A or class B licensee under this section shall be paid to the other licensed racetrack.